Alabama, session 2026rs, SB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
8 Section 1. Section 41-22-20 of the Code of Alabama
9 1975, is amended to read as follows:
10 "§41-22-20
11 (a) A person who has exhausted all administrative
12 remedies available within the agency, other than rehearing,
13 and who is aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case
14 is entitled to judicial review under this chapter. A
15 preliminary, procedural, or intermediate agency action or
16 ruling is immediately reviewable if review of the final agency
17 decision would not provide an adequate remedy.
18 (b) All proceedings for review may be instituted by
19 filing of notice of appeal or review and a cost bond with the
20 agency to cover the reasonable costs of preparing the
21 transcript of the proceeding under review, unless waived by
22 the agency or the court on a showing of substantial hardship.
23 A petition shall be filed either in the Circuit Court of
24 Montgomery County or in the circuit court of the county in
25 which the agency maintains its headquarters, or unless
26 otherwise specifically provided by statute, in the circuit
27 court of the county where a party other than an intervenor,
28 resides, or if a party, other than an intervenor, is a
Page 1

resides, or if a party, other than an intervenor, is a
SB167 Enrolled
29 corporation, domestic or foreign, having a registered office
30 or business office in this state, then in the county of the
31 registered office or principal place of business within this
32 state.
33 (c) The filing of the notice of appeal or the petition
34 does not itself stay enforcement of the agency decision. If
35 the agency decision has the effect of suspending or revoking a
36 license, a stay or supersedeas shall be granted as a matter of
37 right upon such conditions as are reasonable, unless the
38 reviewing court, upon petition of the agency, determines that
39 a stay or supersedeas would constitute a probable danger to
40 the public health, safety, or welfare. In all other cases, the
41 agency may grant, or the reviewing court may order, a stay
42 upon appropriate terms, but, in any event, the order shall
43 specify the conditions upon which the stay or supersedeas is
44 granted;, provided, however, if the appeal or proceedings for
45 review to any reviewing court is from an order of the agency
46 increasing or reducing or refusing to increase rates, fares,
47 or charges, or any of them, or any schedule or parts of any
48 schedule of rates, fares, or charges, the reviewing court
49 shall not direct or order a supersedeas or stay of the action
50 or order to be reviewed without requiring, as a condition
51 precedent to the granting of such the supersedeas, that the
52 party applying for supersedeas or stay shall execute and file
53 with the clerk of the court a bond as provided for and
54 required by statute or law. If the circuit court shall fail
55 fails or refuse refuses to grant supersedeas or stay, the
56 party seeking such relief may petition the appropriate court
Page 2

party seeking such relief may petition the appropriate court
SB167 Enrolled
57 to which the appeal or review lies to order a supersedeas or
58 stay of the action or order of the agency from which review is
59 sought. After the required bond shall have has been filed and
60 approved by the clerk, such the agency order shall be stayed
61 and superseded, and it shall be lawful to charge the rates,
62 fares, or charges which have been reduced, refused, or denied
63 by the agency order, until the final disposition of the cause.
64 The provisions of this This subsection shall apply when
65 applicable, anything in Rule 60 of the Alabama Rules of Civil
66 Procedure restricting the provisions of this subsection to the
67 contrary notwithstanding.
68 (d) The notice of appeal or review shall be filed
69 within 30 days after the receipt of the notice of or other
70 service of the final decision of the agency upon the
71 petitioner or, if a rehearing is requested under Section
72 41-22-17, within 30 days after the receipt of the notice of or
73 other service of the decision of the agency thereon. The
74 petition for judicial review in the circuit court shall be
75 filed within 30 days after the filing of the notice of appeal
76 or review. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the
77 agency and all parties of record. Any person aggrieved who is
78 not a party may petition to become a party by filing a motion
79 to intervene as provided in Section 41-22-14. Failure to file
80 such the petition within the time stated shall operate as a
81 waiver of the right of such the person to review under this
82 chapter, except that for good cause shown, the judge of the
83 reviewing court may extend the time for filing, not to exceed
84 an additional 30 days, or, within four months after the
Page 3

an additional 30 days, or, within four months after the
SB167 Enrolled
85 issuance of the agency order, issue an order permitting a
86 review of the agency decision under this chapter
87 notwithstanding such the waiver. Any notice required herein in
88 this subsection which is mailed by the petitioner, certified
89 mail return receipt requested, shall be deemed to have been
90 filed as of the date it the notice is postmarked. This section
91 shall apply to judicial review from the final order or action
92 of all agencies, and amends the judicial review statutes
93 relating to all agencies to provide a period of 30 days within
94 which to appeal or to institute judicial review.
95 (e) If there has been no hearing prior to agency action
96 and the reviewing court finds that the validity of the action
97 depends upon disputed facts, the court shall order the agency
98 to conduct a prompt fact-finding proceeding under this chapter
99 after having a reasonable opportunity to reconsider its
100 determination on the record of the proceedings.
101 (f) Unreasonable delay on the part of an agency in
102 reaching a final decision shall be justification for any
103 person whose rights, duties, or privileges are adversely
104 affected by such the delay to seek a court order compelling
105 action by the agency.
106 (g) Within 30 days after receipt of the notice of
107 appeal or within such additional time as the court may allow,
108 the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original
109 or a certified copy of the entire record and transcript of the
110 proceedings under review. With the permission of the court,
111 the record of the proceedings under review may be shortened by
112 stipulation of all parties to the review proceedings. Any
Page 4

stipulation of all parties to the review proceedings. Any
SB167 Enrolled
113 party found by the reviewing court to have unreasonably
114 refused to stipulate to limit the record may be taxed by the
115 court for such the additional costs as may be occasioned by
116 the refusal. The court may require or permit subsequent
117 corrections or additions to the record when deemed desirable.
118 (h) The petition for review shall name the agency as
119 respondent and shall contain a concise statement of:
120 (1) The nature of the agency action which is the
121 subject of the petition;
122 (2) The particular agency action appealed from;
123 (3) The facts and law on which jurisdiction and venue
124 are based;
125 (4) The grounds on which relief is sought; and
126 (5) The relief sought.
127 (i) In proceedings for judicial review of agency action
128 in a contested case, except where appeal or judicial review is
129 by a trial de novo, a reviewing court shall not itself hear or
130 accept any further evidence with respect to those issues of
131 fact whose determination was entrusted by law to the agency in
132 that contested case proceeding; provided, however, that
133 evidence may be introduced in the reviewing court as to fraud
134 or misconduct of some person engaged in the administration of
135 the agency or procedural irregularities before the agency not
136 shown in the record and the affecting order, ruling, or award
137 from which review is sought, and proof thereon may be taken in
138 the reviewing court. If, before the date set for hearing a
139 petition for judicial review of agency action in a contested
140 case, it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that
Page 5

case, it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that
SB167 Enrolled
141 additional evidence is material and that there were good
142 reasons for failure to present it that additional evidence in
143 the contested case proceeding before the agency, the court may
144 remand to the agency and order that the additional evidence be
145 taken before the agency upon conditions determined by the
146 court. The agency may modify its findings and decision in the
147 case by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that
148 evidence and any modification, new findings, or decision with
149 the reviewing court and mail copies of the new findings, or
150 decision to all parties.
151 (j)(1) The review shall be conducted by the court
152 without a jury and, except as herein provided in subdivision
153 (2), shall in the review of contested cases be confined to the
154 record and the additions thereto as may be made under
155 subsection (i) of this section. Judicial review shall be by
156 trial de novo in the circuit court where review is sought from
157 tax assessments, tax determinations, or tax redeterminations,
158 rulings of the Revenue Department of Revenue granting,
159 denying, or revoking licenses, or rulings on petitions for tax
160 refunds, or, unless a subsequent agency statute provides
161 otherwise, where an agency statute existing on the effective
162 date of Act No. 81-855, 1981 Acts of Alabama, or thereafter
163 enacted provides for a trial de novo on appeal to or review by
164 the courts; provided, however,. inIn the review of tax
165 assessments, tax determinations, or tax redeterminations,
166 rulings of the Revenue Department of Revenue granting,
167 denying, or revoking licenses, or rulings on petitions for tax
168 refunds, the administrative record and transcript shall be
Page 6

refunds, the administrative record and transcript shall be
SB167 Enrolled
169 transmitted to the reviewing court as provided in subsection
170 (g) of this section, and, on motion of either party, shall be
171 admitted into evidence in the trial de novo, subject to the
172 rights of either party to assign errors, objections, or
173 motions to exclude calling attention to any testimony or
174 evidence in the administrative record or transcript which is
175 deemed objectionable or inadmissible. Provided further that
176 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), with the consent
177 of all parties, judicial review may be on the administrative
178 record and transcript.
179 (3) The court, upon request, shall hear oral argument
180 and receive written briefs.
181 (k) Except where judicial review is by trial de novo,
182 the agency order shall be taken as prima facie just and
183 reasonable and the court shall not substitute its judgment for
184 that of the agency as to the weight of the evidence on
185 questions of fact, except where otherwise authorized by
186 statute. The court may affirm the agency action or remand the
187 case to the agency for taking additional testimony and
188 evidence or for further proceedings. The court may reverse or
189 modify the decision or grant other appropriate relief from the
190 agency action, equitable or legal, including declaratory
191 relief, if the court finds that the agency action is due to be
192 set aside or modified under standards set forth in appeal or
193 review statutes applicable to that agency or if substantial
194 rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the
195 agency action is any one or more of the following:
196 (1) In violation of constitutional or statutory
Page 7

(1) In violation of constitutional or statutory
SB167 Enrolled
197 provisions;.
198 (2) In excess of the statutory authority of the
199 agency;.
200 (3) In violation of any pertinent agency rule;.
201 (4) Made upon unlawful procedure;.
202 (5) Affected by other error of law;.
203 (6) Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable,
204 probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or.
205 (7) Unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious, or
206 characterized by an abuse of discretion or a clearly
207 unwarranted exercise of discretion.
208 (l) During the review, when interpreting any statute or
209 rule, the court may consider, but shall not defer to, an
210 agency's interpretation and shall instead interpret its
211 meaning and effect without any presumption as to correctness.
212 In an action brought by or against an agency, after applying
213 all customary tools of interpretation, the court shall
214 exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a reasonable
215 interpretation.
216 (l)(m) Unless the court affirms the decision of the
217 agency, the court shall set out in writing, which writing
218 shall become a part of the record, the reasons for its
219 decision."
220 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
221 1, 2026.
Page 8

1, 2026.
SB167 Enrolled
222
223
224
225
226
227
228 ________________________________________________
229 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
230
231
232
233 ________________________________________________
234 Speaker of the House of Representatives
235
236
237 SB167
238 Senate 05-Feb-26
239 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
240 the Senate, as amended.
241
242 Patrick Harris,
243 Secretary.
244
245
246
247
248 House of Representatives
249 Passed: 17-Mar-26
250
251
252
253
254 By: Senator Orr
Page 9